North Carolina, session 2025, SB344.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) To the extent allowable under federal law, the Department of Health
and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, shall amend its rules and policies for
determining eligibility for Medicaid, as necessary, to ensure that a transfer of funds by an
individual 65 years of age or older into a trust that conforms with 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(C) is
treated as a transfer for fair market value under 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(2)(C)(i) to the extent that
the individual making the transfer demonstrates that the funds transferred into the trust are
intended to be used by the trustee of the trust, within the life expectancy of the individual, to
provide to the individual goods and services valued at the fair market value of the funds
transferred into the trust.
SECTION 1.(b) To the extent allowable under federal law, the Department of Health
and Human Services shall amend its rules and policies for determining eligibility for
State-County Special Assistance, as necessary, to ensure that a transfer of funds by an individual
65 years of age or older into a trust that conforms with 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(d)(4)(C) is treated as
a transfer for fair market value under 42 U.S.C. § 1382b(c)(1)(C)(iii)(I) to the extent that the
individual making the transfer demonstrates that the funds transferred into the trust are intended
to be used by the trustee of the trust, within the life expectancy of the individual, to provide to
the individual goods and services valued at the fair market value of the funds transferred into the
trust.
*S344-v-3*

SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 19th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Timothy Reeder, MD
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Page 2 Senate Bill 344-Ratified